Utah statutes.
4-32-15.   Inspection of products placed in containers -- Supervision of inspector -- Access to establishment.

(1) No inspection of products placed in any container at any official establishment shall be deemed to be complete until the products are sealed or enclosed under the supervision of an inspector.

(2)  For purposes of any inspection of products required by this chapter, inspectors authorized by the department shall have access at all times to every part of every establishment required to have inspection whether the establishment is operated or not.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

